Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1480.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 25NONPUBLIC DATABASE REGISTRY OFDOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENDERSSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. Database RegistrySUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.2501. Scope of chapter.2502. Definitions.12345678910111213141516171819 § 2501. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the nonpublic database registry of domestic violence offenders.§ 2502. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Database registry." The Nonpublic Database Registry for Domestic Violence Offenders established under section 2511 (relating to establishment)."Family or household members." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102(a) (relating to definitions)."Law enforcement agency." Any of the following:(1) The Pennsylvania State Police.(2) A police department of a municipality.(3) Any other entity that employs individuals who, by virtue of their office or public employment, are vested by law with a duty to maintain public order or make arrests for offenses, whether the duty extends to all offenses or is limited to specific offenses.(4) The Office of Attorney General.(5) A county district attorney's office."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township of this Commonwealth.SUBCHAPTER BDATABASE REGISTRYSec.2511. Establishment.2512. Implementation and administration.2513. Purpose.20250HB1480PN2271 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 2514. Accessibility.2515. Characteristics generally.2516. Registration.2517. In-person reporting.2518. Information.2519. Penalties.§ 2511. Establishment.The Nonpublic Database Registry for Domestic Violence Offenders is established to carry out the purposes of this chapter.§ 2512. Implementation and administration.The Pennsylvania State Police shall implement and administer the database registry.§ 2513. Purpose.The purpose of the database registry shall be to maintain a complete and systematic index of all records regarding domestic violence offenders in this Commonwealth.§ 2514. Accessibility.The database registry shall be accessible only by a law enforcement agency and the Office of Victim Advocate.§ 2515. Characteristics generally.The database registry shall be:(1) Composed of an electronic database and digitized records.(2) Able to communicate with analogous registries established in other jurisdictions.§ 2516. Registration.(a) Who must register.--An individual who has been convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for an offense under any of the following, or an attempt to commit an offense under any of the 20250HB1480PN2271 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following, against family or household members shall register with the Pennsylvania State Police to be included in the database registry:(1) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502 (relating to murder).(2) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2503 (relating to voluntary manslaughter).(3) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2504 (relating to involuntary manslaughter).(4) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2701 (relating to simple assault), if the offense is graded as a misdemeanor of the second degree or higher.(5) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702 (relating to aggravated assault).(6) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2705 (relating to recklessly endangering another person).(7) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2706 (relating to terroristic threats).(8) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2709.1 (relating to stalking).(9) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2718 (relating to strangulation).(10) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2901 (relating to kidnapping).(11) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2902 (relating to unlawful restraint).(12) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2903 (relating to false imprisonment).(b) Period of registration.--An individual who is required to register under subsection (a) shall remain registered in the database registry as follows:(1) If an individual registered as a result of murder or voluntary manslaughter, the individual shall remain registered for the life of the individual.(2) If an individual registered as a result of involuntary manslaughter, aggravated assault, strangulation or kidnapping, the individual shall remain registered for a period of 25 years.20250HB1480PN2271 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) If an individual registered as a result of terroristic threats or stalking, the individual shall remain registered for a period of 15 years.(4) If an individual registered as a result of simple assault, recklessly endangering another person, unlawful restraint or false imprisonment, the individual shall remain registered for a period of five years.(c) Commencement of registration.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), the period of registration under subsection (b) shall commence as follows:(i) For an individual who committed an offense which requires registration in the database registry, the period of registration shall commence upon any of the following:(A) Release from incarceration in a State or county correctional facility, including release to a community correction center or community contract facility.(B) Parole or a sentence of probation.(C) A sentence of State or county intermediate punishment in which the individual is not sentenced to a period of incarceration.(ii) For an individual who is a juvenile offender, the period of registration shall commence upon any of the following:(A) Release from an institution or facility described in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6352(a)(3) (relating to disposition of delinquent child), if the juvenile offender is subject to the jurisdiction of a court pursuant to a disposition entered under 42 Pa.C.S. § 20250HB1480PN2271 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 6352 and is under court-ordered placement in an institution or facility described in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6352(a)(3).(B) Disposition, if the juvenile offender is subject to the jurisdiction of a court pursuant to a disposition entered under 42 Pa.C.S. § 6352 and is placed on probation or is otherwise subject to jurisdiction of a court pursuant to a disposition under 42 Pa.C.S. § 6352 that did not involve out-of-home placement.(2) The period of registration under paragraph (1) shall be tolled for the period of time in which the individual is any of the following:(i) Incarcerated in a Federal, State or county correctional institution, excluding a community contract facility or community corrections center.(ii) Subject to a sentence of intermediate punishment which is restrictive and the individual is sentenced to a period of incarceration.(iii) Committed to an institution or facility described in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6352(a)(3) that provides the individual with 24-hour-per-day supervision and care.(iv) Incarcerated in a Federal correctional institution, excluding a community contract facility or community corrections center.(3) This subsection shall apply to an individual who is:(i) Recommitted to a Federal, State or county correctional institution for a parole violation or has been sentenced to an additional term of imprisonment.(ii) Committed or recommitted to a Federal 20250HB1480PN2271 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 correctional institution.(4) In the case of recommitment to a State or county correctional institution under paragraph (3), the Department of Corrections or the county correctional facility shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police of the admission of the individual.§ 2517. In-person reporting.(a) Periodic in-person appearance required.--Except as provided in subsections (b), (c) and (d), an individual who is required to register in accordance with section 2516(a) (relating to registration) shall appear in person at an approved registration site established by the Pennsylvania State Police to provide or verify the information specified in section 2518(a) (relating to information) and be photographed. The following apply:(1) If the individual registered as a result of murder or voluntary manslaughter, the individual shall appear on a quarterly basis.(2) If the individual registered as a result of involuntary manslaughter, aggravated assault, strangulation, stalking or terroristic threats, the individual shall appear on a semiannual basis.(3) If the individual registered as a result of simple assault or recklessly endangering another person, the individual shall appear on an annual basis.(b) Transient.--If an individual who is required to register in accordance with section 2516(a) is a transient, the following apply:(1) The individual shall appear in person at an approved registration site established by the Pennsylvania State 20250HB1480PN2271 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Police to provide or verify the information specified in section 2518(a) and be photographed on a monthly basis.(2) The duty to appear in person on a monthly basis and be photographed shall apply until the individual establishes a residence. If the individual establishes a residence, the requirement of periodic in-person appearances under subsection (a) shall apply.(c) Juvenile offender.--If an individual who is required to register in accordance with section 2516(a) is a juvenile offender who is not a transient, the individual shall appear in person at an approved registration site established by the Pennsylvania State Police to provide or verify the information specified in section 2518(a) and be photographed on a quarterly basis.(d) Updating information.--In addition to the periodic in-person appearance required in subsections (a), (b) and (c), an individual who is required to register in accordance with section 2516(a) shall appear in person at an approved registration site established by the Pennsylvania State Police within three business days to provide current information relating to the individual's:(1) Change in name, including an alias.(2) Commencement of residence, change in residence, termination of residence or failure to maintain a residence, in which case the individual shall be deemed a transient.(3) Commencement of employment, change in the location or entity in which the individual is employed or termination of employment.(4) Initial enrollment as a student, change in enrollment as a student or termination as a student.20250HB1480PN2271 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Additional or change in telephone number, including a cell phone number, or termination of telephone number, including a cell phone number.(6) Additional, change in or termination of a motor vehicle, watercraft or aircraft owned or operated by the individual. The individual must provide:(i) The license plate number, registration number or other identifier of the motor vehicle, watercraft or aircraft.(ii) Any addition to or change in the address of the place where the motor vehicle, watercraft or aircraft is stored.(7) Commencement of temporary lodging, change in temporary lodging or termination of temporary lodging. The individual must provide the specific length of time and the dates during which the individual will be temporarily lodged.(8) Additional, change in or termination of email address, instant message address or other designation used in Internet communications or postings.(9) Additional, change in or termination of information related to occupational and professional licensing, including type of license held and license number.(e) Notice of change.--If an individual who is required to register in accordance with section 2516(a) makes a change to the information specified under subsection (d), the Pennsylvania State Police shall notify the Office of Victim Advocate of the change. Upon notification, the Office of Victim Advocate shall immediately inform any victim of the individual's offense of the change.(f) Incarcerated or committed individuals.--The requirements 20250HB1480PN2271 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of subsections (a), (b), (c) and (d) shall not apply to an individual who is required to register in accordance with section 2516(a) and who is:(1) incarcerated in a correctional institution, excluding a community contract facility or community corrections center;(2) subject to a sentence of intermediate punishment which is restrictive and the individual is sentenced to a period of incarceration; or(3) committed to an institution or facility specified in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6352(a)(3) (relating to disposition of delinquent child), which provides the individual with 24-hour-per-day supervision and care.§ 2518. Information.(a) Provided by domestic violence offender.--An individual who is required to register in accordance with section 2516(a) (relating to registration) shall provide the following information for inclusion in the database registry:(1) The primary or given name of the individual, including an alias, nickname, pseudonym or ethnic or tribal name, regardless of the context used, and any designation or moniker used by the individual for self-identification in Internet communications or postings.(2) Any designation used by the individual for purposes of routing or self-identification in Internet communications or postings.(3) The telephone number, including cell phone number, and any other designation used by the individual for purposes of routing or self-identification in telephonic communications.20250HB1480PN2271 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The valid Social Security number issued to the individual by the Federal Government and purported Social Security number.(5) The address of each residence or intended residence of the individual, whether or not the residence or intended residence is located within this Commonwealth, and the location at which the individual receives mail, including a post office box. If the individual fails to maintain a residence and is therefore a transient, the individual shall provide information for the registry as specified in paragraph (6).(6) If the individual is a transient, the following apply:(i) The individual shall provide the following information:(A) Information about the individual's temporary habitat or other temporary place of abode or dwelling, including a homeless shelter or park.(B) A list of places where the individual eats, frequents and engages in leisure activities and any planned destinations, including those outside this Commonwealth.(ii) If the individual changes or adds to the places listed under this paragraph during a monthly period, the individual shall list the places when registering as a transient during the next monthly period and shall provide the place that the individual receives mail, including a post office box. The duty to provide the information under this subparagraph shall apply until the individual establishes a residence.20250HB1480PN2271 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Temporary lodging of the individual, including the specific length of time and the dates during which the individual will be temporarily lodged.(8) A passport and documents establishing immigration status, which shall be copied in a digitized format for inclusion in the database registry.(9) The name and address of the employer or prospective employer of the individual. If the individual is not employed in a fixed workplace, the individual shall provide information regarding general travel routes and general areas where the individual works.(10) Information relating to occupational and professional licensing of the individual, including the type of license held and license number.(11) The name and address of the institution in which the individual is a student or will be a student.(12) Information relating to any motor vehicle, watercraft or aircraft owned or operated by the individual, including the following:(i) A description of each motor vehicle, watercraft or aircraft.(ii) The license plate number, registration number or other identification number of each motor vehicle, watercraft or aircraft.(iii) The address of the place where each motor vehicle, watercraft or aircraft is stored.(iv) The license of the individual to operate each motor vehicle, watercraft or aircraft, or other identification card, issued by the Commonwealth, another jurisdiction or a foreign country so that the 20250HB1480PN2271 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania State Police can fulfill its responsibilities under subsection (b)(7).(13) The actual date of birth and purported date of birth of the individual.(b) Provided by Pennsylvania State Police.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall ensure that the following information related to an individual who is required to register in accordance with section 2516(a) is also included in the database registry:(1) A physical description of the individual, including a general physical description and tattoos, scars and other identifying marks.(2) The text of the statute defining the criminal offense for which the individual is registered.(3) The criminal history record information of the individual, including:(i) Dates of arrests and convictions.(ii) The status of probation, parole or supervised release.(iii) Whether the individual is in compliance with requirements regarding this chapter or has absconded.(iv) The existence of any outstanding warrants.(4) A current photograph of the individual.(5) A set of fingerprints and palm prints of the individual. The palm prints shall be taken for the purpose of submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation Central Database and shall be submitted for entry into the database registry.(6) A DNA sample of the individual. The DNA sample shall be taken for the purpose of analysis and entry into the Combined DNA Index System (CODIS) and shall be analyzed and 20250HB1480PN2271 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 submitted for entry into the database registry.(7) A photocopy of the valid driver's license or identification card issued to the individual by the Commonwealth, another jurisdiction or a foreign country.§ 2519. Penalties.An individual who is subject to registration under this chapter commits a misdemeanor of the first degree if the individual knowingly fails to:(1) Register with the Pennsylvania State Police as required under this chapter.(2) Verify the address of the individual or be photographed as required under this chapter.(3) Provide accurate information when registering and periodically appearing in person as required under this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1480PN2271 - 14 - 12345678910111213141516